Arkansas, session 2025, HB1889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-56-303(b), concerning the limitations on
access to a dispensary or cultivation facility, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) A cultivation facility or dispensary may allow access by
visitors to restricted areas of the cultivation facility or dispensary if:
(A) The visitor:
(i) Presents a government-issued identification upon
entry;
(ii) Wears a visitor designation tag at all times;
(iii) Is escorted by authorized personnel at all
times in the cultivation facility;
(iv) Is not a minor; and
*JMB579*
03/20/2025 4:29:18 PM JMB579

HB1889
(v) Has been invited by the cultivation facility or
management personnel of the cultivation facility or dispensary; and
(B) The cultivation facility or dispensary maintains:
(i) A log book recording the name, address, and
purpose of the visit for each visitor; and
(ii) Video surveillance of the restricted areas.
(2)(A) A parent with a registry identification card or a
designated caregiver registry identification card may bring his or her child
or children into a dispensary or cultivation facility for the purpose of
purchasing usable marijuana.
(B) A parent without a designated caregiver registry
identification card or registry identification card may accompany his or her
child who has a registry identification card into a dispensary or cultivation
facility for the purpose of purchasing usable marijuana for the child or
children.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-56-309. Authorized deliveries by dispensary via delivery vehicle
and drive-through window.
(a)(1) A dispensary may deliver usable marijuana to a qualified
patient or designated caregiver at a residential address via a delivery
vehicle.
(2) The delivery may only occur on the date that the order is
processed.
(3)(A) A delivery manifest shall accompany the delivery vehicle.
(B) Each delivery shall:
(i) Be packaged separately; and
(ii) Include a delivery ticket listing all products
to be delivered and the name and registry identification card information of
the purchasing qualified patient or designated caregiver.
(4) Before delivery of the usable marijuana, the delivery driver
shall visually confirm the validity of the registry identification card of
the qualified patient or designated caregiver who submitted the order and
verify that the information matches the delivery ticket.
(5) A vehicle delivering usable marijuana to a qualified patient
03/20/2025 4:29:18 PM JMB579

HB1889
or a designated caregiver may be staffed with a single dispensary employee if
the vehicle is equipped with additional security measures, such as global
positioning system or real-time camera monitoring.
(b)(1) A dispensary may deliver usable marijuana to a qualified
patient or designated caregiver via a drive-through window located at the
dispensary.
(2) The delivery via a drive-through window may only occur on
the date that the order is processed.
(3) Only patients with previously submitted online orders may
receive delivery via a drive-through window.
(4) Each drive-through window delivery shall:
(A) Be packaged separately in an opaque exit bag; and
(B) Include a delivery ticket listing all products to be
delivered and the name and registry identification card information for the
purchasing qualified patient or designated caregiver.
(5) Before delivery of the usable marijuana via the drive-
through window, the dispensary employee shall visually confirm the validity
of the registry identification card of the qualified patient or designated
caregiver who submitted the order and verify that the information matches the
delivery ticket.
(6) The drive-through window shall:
(A) Be tinted to ensure that the interior of the
dispensary is not visible through the exterior of the drive-through window;
(B) Be secure from unauthorized access; and
(C) Use a bank style delivery drawer for the exchange of
registry identification cards, payment, and usable marijuana packaged in an
exit bag.
(c) The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may promulgate rules to
implement this section.







03/20/2025 4:29:18 PM JMB579